District of Columbia statutes.
11-705

Assignment of judges; divisions; hearings.

(a)

Judges of the court shall sit on the court and its divisions in such order and at such times as the court directs.

(b)

Cases and controversies shall be heard and determined by divisions of the court unless a hearing or a rehearing before the court in banc is ordered. Each division of the court shall consist of three judges.

(c)

A hearing before the court in banc may be ordered by a majority of the judges of the court in regular active service. The court in banc for a hearing shall consist of the judges of the court in regular active service.

(d)

A rehearing before the court in banc may be ordered by a majority of the judges of the court in regular active service. The court in banc for a rehearing shall consist of the judges of the court in regular active service, except that a retired judge may sit as a judge of the court in banc in the rehearing of a case or controversy if the judge sat on the court or a division of the court at the original hearing thereof.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 479, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(2), 108 Stat. 713

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-705.
1973 Ed., § 11-705.